Washington statutes.
RCW 13.04.043

Administrator—Obtaining interpreters.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1174-S2.SL) ***

The administrator of juvenile court shall obtain interpreters as needed consistent with the intent and practice of chapter 2.43 RCW, to enable non-English-speaking youth and their families to participate in detention, probation, or court proceedings and programs.

[1993 c 415 s 6.]

NOTES:

Intent—1993 c 415: See note following RCW 2.56.030.